Tennessee, session 114, SB0470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
49-6-8201. Short title.
This part is known and may be cited as the "Protecting Tennessee Schools and
Events Act."
49-6-8202. Part definitions.
As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Aggregate data" means summary level information collected to
represent overall trends and outcomes, without reference to individual students
or specific incidents;
(2) "Continuous operation" means the ability of the walk-through metal
detector to function without interruption for a specified duration when powered by
an internal battery, without the need for recharging or external power;
(3) "Deployment" means the installation, strategic placement, and
operational use of walk-through metal detectors by an LEA, in accordance with
this part;
(4) "Grant" means a protecting Tennessee schools and events
assistance grant awarded to an LEA pursuant to this part;
(5) "Implementation effectiveness" means the overall impact and
functionality of walk-through metal detectors in enhancing school security, as
measured by activation counts, categorized items detected, and stakeholder
feedback;
- 2 - 000819

(6) "Ingress protection rating" means the level of protection against dust
and water intrusion for electronic devices at an IP54 standard;
(7) "Maintenance" includes, but is not limited to, the regular inspection,
testing, repair, and upkeep of walk-through metal detectors to ensure the walk-
through metal detectors are properly functioning in accordance with the
manufacturer's specifications;
(8) "Modular design" means a design in which the walk-through metal
detector can be broken down into no more than four (4) separate components for
ease of transport, setup, breakdown, and maintenance;
(9) "Portable walk-through metal detector" means a non-intrusive
electronic device designed to detect the presence of concealed metallic objects
on an individual passing through its portal by generating a magnetic field, and the
device is equipped with advanced safety features to ensure maximum security
while safeguarding students' well-being and privacy;
(10) "Qualitative feedback" means subjective insights and observations
gathered from school personnel and stakeholders, typically collected through
structured interviews or surveys, reflecting their perceptions of safety and
security impacts;
(11) "School events" means extracurricular activities, athletic
competitions, performances, assemblies, or other gatherings that are officially
organized or sanctioned by an LEA and held on school grounds or at other
locations designated by the LEA, whether occurring during, before, or after
regular school hours; and
(12) "Training" means initial and ongoing instruction and guidance
provided to personnel on the safe and effective use of portable walk-through
- 3 - 000819

metal detectors, covering protocols for safety procedures, detection techniques,
and appropriate interaction with students and the public.
49-6-8203. Establishment of grant program.
(a) By July 1, 2025, the department of education shall establish a pilot program
to award protecting Tennessee schools and events assistance grants to LEAs located in
counties identified as distressed or at-risk by the economic and community
development's performance metrics for the fiscal year 2025, using funds appropriated by
the general appropriations act for such purpose. The primary purpose of the grants is to
assist LEAs located in counties identified as distressed or at-risk in purchasing portable
walk-through metal detectors.
(b) The grants awarded pursuant to this part are dependent on the amount
appropriated for the grants. It is the intent of the general assembly that funds are
appropriated in an amount sufficient to provide each LEA that meets the requirements of
subsection (a) with three (3) portable walk-through metal detectors. It is the intent of this
part that the maximum amount of a grant awarded to an LEA for purchasing a portable
walk-through metal detector shall not exceed sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000) per
portable walk-through metal detector or forty-eight thousand dollars ($48,000) total per
LEA.
(c) An LEA that meets the requirements of subsection (a) may apply to the
department for a grant. The department shall award these grants on a first-come, first-
served basis. An LEA shall not be awarded more than the general assembly's intent in
subsection (b).
49-6-8204. Portable walk-through metal detectors.
A portable walk-through metal detector obtained by a grant awarded pursuant to
this part must:
- 4 - 000819

(1) Demonstrate the capacity to process at least twenty-five (25)
individuals per minute or one thousand five hundred (1,500) individuals per hour
in a single lane, under optimal flow conditions, with one (1) operator, excluding
additional time required for individual checks when an alarm is triggered;
(2) Feature an open-top design, eliminating the need for a top arch,
which prevents any height restrictions and promotes an unrestricted walkthrough
experience, enhancing overall user comfort by allowing for natural walking
posture;
(3) Comfortably accommodate foot traffic, wheelchairs, and other mobility
assistance devices, such as walkers or crutches, adhering to accessibility
standards to ensure inclusive use by all individuals;
(4) Activate a customizable alarm with both visual and audible alerts that
can be adjusted for volume and tone. The alarm must activate in real-time or
immediately upon detection to ensure the individual remains within the detection
area for further inspection if needed;
(5) Include a multi-zone light array capable of pinpointing the precise
location of detected items on a person's body, enabling quick identification of
potential threats. The multi-zone light must be clearly visible and effective in both
bright and low-light conditions, ensuring consistent performance across diverse
environments;
(6) Have customizable audible alerts in both volume and tone;
(7) Include adjustable sensitivity settings for metal detection, enabling
operators to calibrate the device according to the specific needs and
environmental conditions of different school settings. The adjustable sensitivity
settings must:
- 5 - 000819

(A) Minimize false alarms by allowing for fine-tuning to ignore
common non-threatening metal items;
(B) Maintain high detection rates for actual threats;
(C) Support different sensitivity levels for various zones within the
detector; and
(D) Be user-friendly to ensure that the portable walk-through
metal detector can be easily tailored to operational requirements;
(8) Be equipped with all necessary functions integrated directly into the
unit, operating without external devices like tablets or smartphones for viewing
scan results;
(9) Be designed for portability, including:
(A) A mobile base with four (4) lockable wheels for secure
positioning;
(B) Balanced weight distribution for one-handed maneuverability;
(C) Capability of passing through a standard doorway without
disassembly;
(D) Capability to navigate various terrains without modification to
the portable walk-through metal detector; and
(E) An integrated design that requires no additional equipment for
movement;
(10) Have an ingress protection rating;
(11) Be equipped with a rechargeable battery designed to provide at
least six (6) hours of continuous operation without recharging;
(12) Have a modular design; and
- 6 - 000819

(13) Include or be compatible with a dedicated travel case, engineered to
ensure safe handling, protection during transit, and secure storage, minimizing
the risk of damage during movement between locations.
49-6-8205. Procurement.
(a) The local board of education for an LEA that is awarded a grant pursuant to §
49-6-8203 shall procure portable walk-through metal detectors in compliance with the
minimum specification requirements described in § 49-6-8204. The procurement
process must be managed by the LEA's director of schools or a designated
administrative office in compliance with this state's procurement laws.
(b)
(1) An LEA shall use a competitive procurement process, as described in
§ 49-2-203(a)(3), to satisfy the requirements of subsection (a).
(2) In selecting a vendor, an LEA shall comply with the requirements of
the Tennessee Minority-Owned, Woman-Owned, Service-Disabled Veteran-
Owned, Business Owned by Persons with Disabilities, and Small Business
Procurement and Contracting Act, compiled in title 12, chapter 3, part 11.
(c) In awarding a contract for the procurement of portable walk-through metal
detectors, an LEA:
(1) Shall prioritize vendors that demonstrate the ability to provide
additional features or services that enhance school safety and operational
efficiency, including:
(A) Capabilities for visitor management and health screening,
supporting credentialing, health screenings, and security screenings for
diverse school and event needs;
- 7 - 000819

(B) Integration with automated access control and real-time
monitoring systems, enabling real-time alerts and enhanced access
management;
(C) Data collection and analysis tools for monitoring visitor flow,
alarm frequency, and security trends; and
(D) An operational presence within this state, ensuring
responsiveness and familiarity with local needs, as well as the ability to
provide ongoing maintenance and support; and
(2) May give additional consideration to vendors offering enhanced
service options, including expedited delivery, on-site training, or the ability to
integrate portable walk-through metal detectors with existing security
infrastructure.
49-6-8206. Special Contract terms – Implementation.
(a) It is the intent of this part that LEAs enter into contracts pursuant to § 49-6-
8205(a) as soon as practicable following the LEA's receipt of a grant under § 49-6-8203.
Subject to the availability of funding, the goal is for all delivery, installation, and setup of
portable walk-through metal detectors to be completed within three hundred sixty-five
(365) days from the effective date of this act.
(b) A contract made pursuant to § 49-6-8205(a) must require that the vendor:
(1) Provide clear operational guidelines to ensure effective use, proper
handling of false alarms, and protection of student privacy; and
(2) Conduct on-site training for school personnel and school resource
officers at a designated location within each LEA. This training must include best
practices tailored to each LEA, covering effective operation, false alarm
protocols, privacy procedures, and strategic deployment.
- 8 - 000819

49-6-8207. Vendor-led data collection and annual reporting.
(a) An LEA shall authorize a vendor procuring a portable walk-through metal
detector pursuant to this part to conduct in-person observations and collect data on the
implementation and overall effectiveness of the portable walk-through metal detectors
procured pursuant to this part. The vendor shall coordinate with the LEA to schedule a
visit on days in which screenings are planned, ensuring comprehensive and relevant
data collection while minimizing disruption to regular operations.
(b) Data collected pursuant to this section must focus exclusively on aggregate
trends and outcomes only and comply with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy
Act (FERPA) (20 U.S.C. 1232g); § 10-7-504; the Data Accessibility, Transparency, and
Accountability Act, compiled in chapter 1, part 7 of this title; and all other relevant privacy
laws. The data collected may include:
(1) Total number of portable walk-through metal detectors' activations per
school;
(2) Categorization of detected items, such as weapons or contraband;
(3) A summary of interventions made by school personnel or law
enforcement due to alerts from portable walk-through metal detectors procured
pursuant to this part; and
(4) Qualitative feedback from school personnel on perceived changes in
safety due to the portable walk-through metal detectors.
(c) The vendor shall submit an annual report to the LEA summarizing key
findings from the data collected pursuant to this section. The LEA shall review the
vendor's report and submit the vendor's report to the department, along with any
additional feedback from the LEA. The department shall submit a consolidated report to
the education committee of the senate and the committee of the house of
- 9 - 000819

representatives having jurisdiction over school safety. The consolidated report must
include:
(1) A clear overview of the collected data and key trends;
(2) An assessment of the effectiveness in enhancing school safety
through the use of portable walk-through metal detectors procured pursuant to
this part;
(3) Identification of any challenges or areas for improvement related to
the use of portable walk-through metal detectors procured pursuant to this part;
and
(4) Legislative recommendations for this part.
SECTION 2. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds must not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 3. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 10 - 000819